California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(i) Efficiently serves distinct customer groups.

(ii) Minimizes duplicative offerings.

(iii) Promotes robust participation by low-income customers.

(B) Consider, as part of the evaluation, the energy load migration trends among bundled and nonbundled customers and any associated risks with maintaining or creating a customer renewable energy subscription program.

(C) If the commission determines a customer renewable energy subscription program does not meet all of the goals described in subparagraph (A), authorize the termination or modification of the program.

 (2) (A) Determine whether it would be beneficial to ratepayers to establish a new tariff or program for an electrical corporation, or modify an existing tariff or program administered by an electrical corporation, to establish a community renewable energy program consistent with the criteria described in subdivision (c). If the
 commission determines that it would be beneficial to ratepayers to establish the community renewable energy program, the commission shall, on or before July 1, 2024, establish the program as part of the same proceeding and require each electrical corporation to participate in the program.

(B) If the commission establishes a community renewable energy program pursuant to subparagraph (A), each community choice aggregator and electric service provider, within 180 days of the establishment of the program, shall notify the commission whether it will participate in the program. A community choice aggregator or electric service provider may begin participating in, or end its participation in, the program at any time by notifying the commission.

(c) The community renewable energy program, if established, shall do all of the following:

(1) Be complementary to, and consistent with, the requirements of Section 10-115 of the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations). For purposes of this paragraph, the commission shall consult with the Energy Commission.

(2) Ensure at least 51 percent of the program’s capacity serves low-income customers.

(3) Minimize impacts to nonparticipating customers by prohibiting
 the program’s costs from being paid by nonparticipating customers in excess of the avoided costs. Qualifying funds for financial incentives shall only be available through an appropriation by the Legislature.

(4) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), require that all of the following requirements apply to the construction of a community renewable energy facility
 pursuant to the program:

(i) All construction workers employed in the execution of the project shall be paid at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate.

(ii) The owner of the community renewable energy facility shall ensure that the prevailing wage requirement is included in all contracts for the performance of the work.

(iii) All contractors and subcontractors shall maintain payroll records
 pursuant to Section 1776 of the Labor Code and make those records available for inspection and copying as provided in that section.

(iv) The requirement on contractors and subcontractors to pay prevailing wages pursuant to this section may be enforced by the Labor Commissioner through the issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, which may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code, within 18 months after the completion of the project, by an underpaid worker through an administrative complaint or civil action, or by a joint labor-management committee
 through a civil action under Section 1771.2 of the Labor Code. If a civil wage and penalty assessment is issued, the contractor, subcontractor, and surety on a bond issued to secure the payment of wages covered by the assessment shall be liable for liquidated damages pursuant to Section 1742.1 of the Labor Code.

(B) Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code and subparagraph (A) shall not apply to the construction of a community renewable energy facility pursuant to the program if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project are subject to a project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure. For purposes of this subparagraph, “project labor agreement”
 has the same meaning as defined in Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(5) Provide bill credits to subscribers based on the avoided costs of the program’s facilities, as determined by the commission’s methods for calculating the full set of benefits of distributed energy resources. The commission may use actual wholesale market prices for the energy supply portion of an avoided cost calculation or credit value.

(6) Prioritize the maximum use of state and federal incentives and accelerate implementation of the program to ensure that time- or quantity-limited federal incentives can be obtained for the benefit of subscribers. As part of this prioritization,
 the commission shall ensure that a community renewable energy facility participating in the community renewable energy program is eligible for an enhanced federal investment tax credit available as a qualified low-income economic benefit project pursuant to subsection (e) of Section 48 of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 350, Sec. 2.   (AB 2316)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

769.5.

(a) The commission may establish an expedited distribution grid interconnection dispute resolution process with the goal of resolving disputes over interconnection applications that are within the jurisdiction of the commission in no more than 60 days from the time the dispute is formally brought to the commission. If the commission establishes an expedited distribution grid interconnection dispute resolution process, the commission may provide exceptions to the 60-day
 time period when more than 60 days are needed to fairly and safely address a dispute.

(b) The expedited distribution grid interconnection dispute resolution process shall include the following elements:

(1) A distribution grid interconnection technical panel consisting of at least eight individuals selected by the commission. Four of the technical panel members shall be from electrical corporations and four shall not be from electrical corporations. The commission shall determine the length of the term of each member. A member shall not participate as a review panel member for the dispute resolution process for a contested interconnection application in any of the following situations:

(A) The member is an employee of, a contractor to, or an employee of a contractor to, an electrical corporation to which the
 contested interconnection application has been submitted.

(B) The member is the applicant, an installer or an employee of an installer for the applicant, or a third-party electricity purchase agreement provider for the applicant.

(C) The member has a direct financial interest in the contested interconnection application.

(2) A review panel of four members shall be selected from the technical panel for each dispute.

(3) If an applicant is unable to resolve an interconnection-related dispute after working with the electrical corporation operating the distribution grid, the applicant may seek resolution of the dispute using the commission’s expedited distribution grid interconnection dispute resolution process.

(4) Upon agreeing to a final settlement of the dispute, parties shall be free to withdraw from the expedited distribution grid interconnection dispute resolution process.

(5) If the dispute is filed with the commission, the commission shall ensure that the review panel shall review the dispute and make a recommendation to the executive director of the commission within 30 days of receiving the dispute.

(6) The commission shall establish a public process to allow the electrical corporation, the applicant, and other interested parties to file written comments on the recommendation of the review panel.

(7) The review panel shall request appropriate documents from the electrical corporation involved in the dispute, including, but not limited to, interconnection
 application studies.

(8) The scope of the review panel’s review shall be limited to issues regarding compliance with the established interconnection rules. Any recommendations shall ensure safe and reliable interconnection.

(9) The scope of the review panel’s review is limited to making recommendations to resolve specific customer disputes and recommending associated corrective actions, and the panel shall have no authority to assess penalties.

(10) Upon receipt of the recommendation from the review panel, the executive director shall have 30 days to review the recommendation and to prepare an order to the electrical corporation resolving the dispute. If the review panel cannot agree on recommendations, then each recommendation of a review panel member shall be submitted to the executive director, who shall make the
 decision resolving the dispute.

(11) Any interested person seeking commission review of the executive director’s determination shall file the request for review within 10 days of the determination. Upon receipt of the request for review, the executive director or the energy division director shall prepare a proposed resolution of the matter for approval by the commission.

(c) The commission shall provide the members of the technical panel who are not from electrical corporations with an appropriate per diem compensation consistent with Section 19822.5 of the Government Code.

(d) The commission shall appoint a qualified electrical systems engineer with substantial interconnection expertise to advise the director of the energy division and shall provide adequate commission staff to assist in resolving interconnection
 disputes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 672, Sec. 1.   (AB 2861)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

770.

The commission may after hearing:

(a) Ascertain and fix just and reasonable standards, classifications, regulations, practices, measurements, or service to be furnished, imposed, observed, and followed by all electrical, gas, water, and heat corporations.

(b) Ascertain and fix adequate and serviceable standards for the measurement of quantity, quality, pressure, or other condition pertaining to the supply of the product, commodity, or
 service furnished or rendered by any such public utility. No standard of the commission applicable to any water corporation shall be inconsistent with the regulations and standards of the State Department of Health pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 116275) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Prescribe reasonable regulations for the examination and testing of the product, commodity, or service and for the measurement thereof.

(d) Establish reasonable rules, specifications, and standards to secure the accuracy of all meters and appliances for measurements. The commission shall require a public utility that estimates meter readings to so indicate on its billings, and shall require any estimate that is incorrect to be corrected by the next billing period, except that for reasons beyond its control due to weather, or in cases of unusual
 conditions, corrections for any overestimate or underestimate shall be reflected on the first regularly scheduled bill and based on an actual reading following the period of inaccessibility.

(e) Provide for the examination and testing of any and all appliances used for the measurement of any product, commodity, or service of any such public utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 410.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

771.

The commissioners and their officers and employees may enter upon any premises occupied by any public utility, for the purpose of making the examinations and tests and exercising any of the other powers provided for in this part, and may set up and use on such premises any apparatus and appliances necessary therefor. The agents and employees of the public utility may be present at the making of such examinations and tests.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

772.

Any consumer or user of any product, commodity, or service of a public utility may have any appliance used in the measurement thereof tested upon paying the fees fixed by the commission. The commission shall establish and fix reasonable fees to be paid for testing such appliances on the request of the consumer or user. The fee shall be paid by the consumer or user at the time of his request, but if the appliance is found defective or incorrect to the disadvantage of the consumer or user, the fee shall be paid by the public utility and repaid to the consumer or user under such rules as the commission prescribes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

773.

Section 4200 of the Government Code shall not apply to a public utility under the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2128.)
-------------------------------------------

774.

No water corporation which has undertaken to provide fire protection service, nor any employee of such corporation acting in the course and scope of his employment, shall be liable for any death or injury to a person or damage to or loss of property resulting from a failure to provide or maintain an adequate water supply or pressure, or any equipment or other fire protection facility or service; provided, that such immunity from liability shall not exceed that of a public agency or any of its employees, as the case may be, under similar circumstances. Nothing in this section shall preclude the enforcement of any rule, regulation, or order of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 663.)
-------------------------------------------

775.

Whenever an electric or gas corporation sells fuel oil which is, or is reasonably expected to be, useful in the performance of its public utility function, at a price higher than the electric or gas corporation’s purchase cost, the commission shall, in any rate proceeding, require that the amount higher than the purchase cost be credited with interest against the expense claimed by the electric or gas corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1360.)
-------------------------------------------

776.

(a) The commission shall, upon making the determination pursuant to subdivision (c), develop and implement performance reliability standards for all backup power systems installed on the property of residential and small commercial customers by a facilities-based provider of telephony services. Those standards shall do all the following:

(1) Establish minimum operating life.

(2) Establish minimum periods of time during which a telephone system with a charged backup power system will provide the customer with sufficient electricity for emergency usage.

(3) Establish means to warn a customer when the backup power system’s charge is low or when the system can no longer hold a charge.

(b) The commission, in developing and implementing any standards in accordance with subdivision (a), shall consider current best practices and technical feasibility for establishing battery backup requirements.

(c) The commission shall not implement standards in accordance with this section unless it determines that the benefits of the standards exceed the costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 425, Sec. 4.   (SB 385)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

776.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, “telecommunications service” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2892.1, but does not include voice communication provided by a provider of satellite telephone service.

(b) As part of a new or existing proceeding, the commission, in consultation with the Office of Emergency Services, shall develop and implement backup electricity rules to require providers of telecommunications service to submit resiliency plans to maintain backup electricity for their telecommunications infrastructure sufficient to maintain telecommunications service for at least 72 hours, except as provided in subdivision (c).

(c) In developing and implementing backup
 electricity rules pursuant to subdivision (b), the commission shall consider best practices, the feasibility of the rules, and stakeholder input. In considering best practices and feasibility, the commission may authorize, in appropriate circumstances, providers of telecommunications service to maintain backup electricity for their telecommunications infrastructure sufficient to maintain telecommunications service for less than 72 hours.

(d) This section does not require the commission to modify the communications resiliency requirements adopted in commission Decision 20-07-011 (July 16, 2020), Decision Adopting Wireless Provider Resiliency Strategies, or Decision 21-02-029 (February 11, 2021), Decision Adopting Wireline Provider Resiliency Strategies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 425, Sec. 2.   (SB 341)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

776.5.

(a) In preparation for receiving notifications regarding the deenergization of electrical lines pursuant to Section 8386 or 8387, a facilities-based mobile telephony services provider shall do all of the following:

(1) Designate contact points or persons within the company to receive notifications from an electrical corporation, local publicly owned electric utility, or electrical cooperative, as defined in Section 2776, for expected deenergization events and outages.

(2) Develop uniform protocols prior to a deenergization event to respond appropriately to an outage.

(b) Upon receipt of a notification regarding the
 deenergization of electrical lines pursuant to Section 8386 or 8387, a facilities-based mobile telephony services provider shall communicate relevant situational information relative to communications capabilities during the projected outage to electrical corporations, local publicly owned electric utilities, electrical cooperatives, and appropriate public safety stakeholders, including, but not limited to, public safety offices and emergency response offices, for the affected area.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 410, Sec. 1.   (SB 560)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

777.

(a) This section applies if there is a landlord-tenant relationship between the residential occupants and the owner, manager, or operator of the dwelling.

(b) If an electrical, gas, heat, or water corporation furnishes individually metered residential service to residential occupants of a detached single-family dwelling, a multiunit residential structure, mobilehome park, or permanent residential structure in a labor camp, as defined in Section 17008 of the Health and Safety Code, and the owner, manager, or operator of the dwelling, structure, or park is the customer of record, the corporation shall make every good faith effort to inform the residential occupants, by means of written notice, when the account is in arrears, that service will be terminated at least 10
 days prior to termination. The written notice shall further inform the residential occupants that they have the right to become customers, to whom the service will then be billed, without being required to pay any amount which may be due on the delinquent account. The notice shall be in English and in the languages listed in Section 1632 of the Civil Code.

(c) The corporation is not required to make service available to the residential occupants unless each residential occupant agrees to the terms and conditions of service and meets the requirements of law and the corporation’s rules and tariffs. However, if one or more of the residential occupants are willing and able to assume responsibility for the subsequent charges to the account to the satisfaction of the corporation, or if there is a physical means, legally available to the corporation, of selectively terminating service to those residential occupants who have not met the requirements of
 the corporation’s rules and tariffs, the corporation shall make service available to those residential occupants who have met those requirements.

(d) If prior service for a period of time is a condition for establishing credit with the corporation, residence and proof of prompt payment of rent or other credit obligation acceptable to the corporation for that period of time is a satisfactory equivalent.

(e) Any residential occupant who becomes a customer of the corporation pursuant to this section whose periodic payments, such as rental payments, include charges for residential electrical, gas, heat, or water service, where those charges are not separately stated, may deduct from the periodic payment each payment period all reasonable charges paid to the corporation for those services during the preceding payment period.

(f) In the case of a detached single-family dwelling, the corporation may do any of the following:

(1) Give notice of termination at least seven days prior to the proposed termination.

(2) In order for the amount due on the delinquent account to be waived, require an occupant who becomes a customer to verify that the delinquent account customer of record is or was the landlord, manager, or agent of the dwelling. Verification may include, but is not limited to, a lease or rental agreement, rent receipts, a government document indicating that the occupant is renting the property, or information disclosed pursuant to Section 1962 of the Civil Code.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 242.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

777.1.

(a) If an electrical, gas, heat, or water corporation furnishes residential service to residential occupants through a master meter in a multiunit residential structure, mobilehome park, or permanent residential structure in a labor camp, as defined in Section 17008 of the Health and Safety Code, and the owner, manager, or operator of the structure or park is listed by the corporation as the customer of
 record, the corporation shall make every good faith effort to inform the residential occupants, by means of a written notice posted on the door of each residential unit at least 15 days prior to termination, when the account is in arrears, that service will be terminated on a date specified in the notice. If it is not reasonable or practicable to post the notice on the door of each residential unit, the corporation shall post two copies of the notice in each accessible common area and at each point of access to the structure or structures. The notice shall further inform the residential occupants that they have the right to become customers, to whom the service will then be billed, without being required to pay any amount which may be due on the delinquent account. The notice also shall specify, in plain language, what the residential occupants are required to do in order to prevent the termination of, or to reestablish service; the estimated monthly cost of service; the title, address, and telephone number
 of a representative of the corporation who can assist the residential occupants in continuing service; and the address and telephone number of a qualified legal services project, as defined in Section 6213 of the Business and Professions Code, which has been recommended by the local county bar association. The notice shall be in English and the languages listed in Section 1632 of the Civil Code.

(b) The corporation is not required to make service available to the residential occupants unless each residential occupant or a representative of the residential occupants agrees to the terms and conditions of service and meets the requirements of law and the corporation’s rules and tariffs. However, if one or more of the residential occupants or the representative of the residential occupants are willing and able to assume responsibility for subsequent charges to the account to the satisfaction of the corporation, or if there is a physical means,
 legally available to the corporation, of selectively terminating service to those residential occupants who have not met the requirements of the corporation’s rules and tariffs or for whom the representative of the residential occupants is not responsible, the corporation shall make service available to those residential occupants who have met those requirements or on whose behalf those requirements have been met.

(c) If prior service for a period of time or other demonstration of credit worthiness is a condition for establishing credit with the corporation, residence and proof of prompt payment of rent or other credit obligation during that period of time acceptable to the corporation is a satisfactory equivalent.

(d) Any residential occupant who becomes a customer of the corporation pursuant to this section whose periodic payments, such as rental payments, include charges for
 residential electrical, gas, heat, or water service, where those charges are not separately stated, may deduct from the periodic payment each payment period all reasonable charges paid to the corporation for those services during the preceding payment period.

(e) If a corporation furnishes residential service subject to subdivision (a), the corporation shall not terminate that service in any of the following situations:

(1) During the pendency of an investigation by the corporation of a customer dispute or complaint.

(2) If the customer has been granted an extension of the period for payment of a bill.

(3) For an indebtedness owed by the customer to any other person or corporation or if the obligation represented by the delinquent account or other
 indebtedness was incurred with a person or corporation other than the electrical, gas, heat, or water corporation demanding payment therefor.

(4) If a delinquent account relates to another property owned, managed, or operated by the customer.

(5) If a public health or building officer certifies that termination would result in a significant threat to the health or safety of the residential occupants or the public.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and in addition to any other remedy provided by law, if the owner, manager, or operator, by any act or omission, directs, permits, or fails to prevent a termination of service while any residential unit receiving that service is occupied, the residential occupant or the representative of the residential occupants may commence an action for the recovery of all
 of the following:

(1) Reasonable costs and expenses incurred by the residential occupant or the representative of the residential occupants related to restoration of service.

(2) Actual damages related to the termination of service.

(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees of the residential occupants, the representative of the residential occupants, or each of them, incurred in the enforcement of this section, including, but not limited to, enforcement of a lien.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and in addition to any other remedy provided by law, if the owner, manager, or operator, by any act or omission, directs, permits, or fails to prevent a termination of service while any residential unit receiving that service is occupied, the corporation
 may commence an action for the recovery of all of the following:

(1) Delinquent charges accruing prior to the expiration of the notice prescribed by subdivision (a).

(2) Reasonable costs incurred by the corporation related to the restoration of service.

(3) Reasonable attorney’s fees of the corporation incurred in the enforcement of this section or in the collection of delinquent charges, including, but not limited to, enforcement of a lien.

If the court finds that the owner, manager, or operator has paid the amount in arrears prior to termination, the court shall allow no recovery of any charges, costs, damages, expenses, or fees under this subdivision from the owner, manager, or operator.

An abstract of any money judgment entered
 pursuant to subdivision (f) or (g) of this section shall be recorded pursuant to Section 697.310 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(h) No termination of service subject to this section may be effected without compliance with this section, and any service wrongfully terminated shall be restored without charge to the residential occupants or customer for the restoration of the service. In the event of a wrongful termination by the corporation, the corporation shall, in addition, be liable to the residential occupants or customer for actual damages resulting from the termination and for the costs of enforcement of this section, including, but not limited to, reasonable attorney’s fees, if the residential occupants or the representative of the residential occupants made a good faith effort to have the service continued without interruption.

(i) The commission shall adopt rules and
 orders necessary to implement this section and shall liberally construe this section to accomplish its purpose of ensuring that service to residential occupants is not terminated due to nonpayment by the customer unless the corporation has made every reasonable effort to continue service to the residential occupants. The rules and orders shall include, but are not limited to, reasonable penalties for a violation of this section, guidelines for assistance to residents in the enforcement of this section, and requirements for the notice prescribed by subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, clear wording, large and boldface type, and comprehensive instructions to ensure full notice to the resident.

(j) Nothing in this section broadens or restricts any authority of a local agency that existed prior to January 1, 1989, to adopt an ordinance protecting a residential occupant from the involuntary termination of residential public utility
 service.

(k) This section preempts any statute or ordinance permitting punitive damages against any owner, manager, or operator on account of an involuntary termination of residential public utility service or permitting the recovery of costs associated with the formation, maintenance, and termination of a tenants’ association.

(l) For purposes of this section, “representative of the residential occupants” does not include a tenants’ association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 201.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

778.

The commission shall adopt rules and regulations, which shall become effective on July 1, 1977, relating to safety appliances and procedures for rail transit services operated at grade and in vehicular traffic. The rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, provisions on grade crossing protection devices, headways, and maximum operating speeds with respect to the speed and volume of vehicular traffic within which the transit service is operated.

The commission shall submit the proposed rules and regulations to the Legislature not later than April 1, 1977.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 924.)
-------------------------------------------

779.

(a) No electrical, gas, heat, or water corporation may terminate residential service for nonpayment of a delinquent account unless the corporation first gives notice of the delinquency and impending termination, as provided in Section 779.1.

(b) No electrical, gas, heat, or water corporation may terminate residential service for nonpayment in any of the following situations:

(1) During the pendency of an investigation by the corporation of a customer or subscriber dispute or complaint.

(2) When a customer has been granted an extension of the period for payment of a bill.

(3) On the certification of a licensed physician and surgeon that to do so will be life threatening to the customer and the customer is financially unable to pay for service within the normal payment period and is willing to enter into an amortization agreement with the corporation pursuant to subdivision (e) with respect to all charges that the customer is unable to pay prior to delinquency.

(c) Any residential customer who has initiated a complaint or requested an investigation within five days of receiving the disputed bill, or who has, before termination of service, made a request for extension of the payment period of a bill asserted to be beyond the means of the customer to pay in full within the normal period for payment, shall
 be given an opportunity for review of the complaint, investigation, or request by a review manager of the corporation. The review shall include consideration of whether the customer shall be permitted to amortize any unpaid balance of the delinquent account over a reasonable period of time, not to exceed 12 months. No termination of service shall be effected for any customer complying with an amortization agreement, if the customer also keeps the account current as charges accrue in each subsequent billing period.

(d) Any customer whose complaint or request for an investigation pursuant to subdivision (c) has resulted in an adverse determination by the corporation may appeal the determination to the commission. Any subsequent appeal of the dispute or complaint to the commission is not subject to this section.

(e) Any customer meeting the requirements of paragraph (3) of
 subdivision (b) shall, upon request, be permitted to amortize, over a period not to exceed 12 months, the unpaid balance of any bill asserted to be beyond the means of the customer to pay within the normal period for payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 888, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

779.1.

(a) Every electrical, gas, heat, or water corporation shall allow every residential customer at least 19 days from the date of mailing its bill for services, postage prepaid, for payment of the charges demanded. A corporation subject to this section shall not terminate residential service for nonpayment of a delinquent account unless the corporation first gives notice of the delinquency and impending termination, at least 10 days prior to the proposed termination, by means of a notice mailed, postage prepaid, to the customer to whom the service is billed, not earlier than 19 days from the date of mailing the corporation’s bill for services, and the 10-day period shall not commence until five days after the mailing of the notice.

(b) Every corporation shall make a reasonable attempt to contact an adult person residing at the premises of the customer by telephone or personal contact at least 24 hours prior to any termination of service, except that, whenever telephone or personal contact cannot be accomplished, the corporation shall give, either by mail or in person, a notice of termination of service at least 48 hours prior to termination.

(c) Every corporation shall make available to its residential customers who are 65 years of age or older, or who are dependent adults as defined in Section 15610.23 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, a third-party notification service, whereby the corporation will attempt to notify a person designated by the customer to receive notification when the customer’s account is past due and subject to termination. The notification shall include information on what is required to prevent termination of service. The residential
 customer shall make a request for third-party notification on a form provided by the corporation, and shall include the written consent of the designated third party. The third-party notification does not obligate the third party to pay the overdue charges, nor shall it prevent or delay termination of service.

(d) Every notice of termination of service pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name and address of the customer whose account is delinquent.

(2) The amount of the delinquency.

(3) The date by which payment or arrangements for payment is required in order to avoid termination.

(4) The procedure by which the customer may initiate a
 complaint or request an investigation concerning service or charges.

(5) The procedure by which the customer may request amortization of the unpaid charges.

(6) The procedure for the customer to obtain information on the availability of financial assistance, including private, local, state, or federal sources, if applicable.

(7) The telephone number of a representative of the corporation who can provide additional information or institute arrangements for payment.

(8) The telephone number of the commission to which inquiries by the customer may be directed.

All written notices shall be in a clear and legible format.

(e) Any residential customer
 whose complaint or request for an investigation has resulted in an adverse determination by the corporation may appeal the determination to the commission. Any subsequent appeal of the dispute or complaint to the commission is not subject to this section.

(f) If a residential customer fails to comply with an amortization agreement, the corporation shall not terminate service without giving notice to the customer at least 48 hours prior to termination of the conditions the customer is required to meet to avoid termination, but this notice does not entitle the customer to further investigation by the corporation.

(g) A termination of service shall not be effected without compliance with this section. Any service wrongfully terminated shall be restored without charge for the restoration of service, and a notation thereof shall be mailed to the customer at the customer’s billing
 address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 243.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

779.2.

(a) No electrical, gas, heat, telephone, or water corporation may terminate residential service for nonpayment of any delinquent account or other indebtedness owed by the customer or subscriber to any other person or corporation or when the obligation represented by the delinquent account or other indebtedness was incurred with a person or corporation other than the electrical, gas, heat, telephone, or water corporation demanding payment therefor.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a telephone corporation operating within service areas which furnishes billing services
 to the subscribers of a telephone corporation operating between service areas pursuant to tariffs on file with the commission providing for the furnishing of those billing services. The commission shall require that these tariffs also provide for adequate subscriber notice, review, and appeal procedures prior to any termination of service for nonpayment of a delinquent account.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any privately owned or publicly owned public utility which collects sanitation or sewerage charges for a public agency pursuant to agreement under Section 54346.2 of the Government Code or Section 5472.5 of the Health and Safety Code.
